Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-393
Persons needing care; admission.

Any person who needs the care provided in a facility shall be eligible for admission to such facility, and admission shall not be restricted to persons who receive services in any other institution operated by the department at the time application is made.

Laws 1973, LB 536, § 6.